Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1205.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Mini truck." A motor vehicle of the keijidōsha class of Japanese imported vehicles commonly referred to as a mini truck 123456789101112131415161718192021 or kei truck that is imported under 49 U.S.C. § 30112(b)(9) (relating to prohibitions on manufacturing, selling, and importing noncomplying motor vehicles and equipment) and has:(1) Four wheels.(2) A truck bed.(3) An engine displacement of 660 cubic centimeters or less.(4) An overall length of 130 inches or less.(5) An overall height of 78 inches or less.(6) An overall width of 60 inches or less.* * *Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1789. Mini trucks. (a) Minimum coverage requirements.--A mini truck that is registered or operated on a highway shall be covered by financial responsibility in the amount of $15,000 for injury to one person in any one accident, in the amount of $30,000 for injury to two or more persons in any one accident and in the amount of $5,000 for damage of property of others in any one accident. The financial responsibility shall be in a form acceptable to the department.(b) Exemption from other coverages.--For a mini truck, no person shall be required to purchase and no insurer shall be required to offer or make available any other coverage contained in this chapter.Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 36ADDITIONAL SPECIAL VEHICLESSubchapterA. (Reserved)20250HB1205PN1353 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 B. Operation of Mini TrucksSUBCHAPTER A(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER BOPERATION OF MINI TRUCKSSec.3610. Scope of subchapter. 3611. Required equipment. 3612. Operation. 3613. Same treatment as passenger cars. 3614. Seating limitation. § 3610. Scope of subchapter. This subchapter applies to the operation of mini trucks on certain highways or roadways in this Commonwealth.§ 3611. Required equipment. (a) General rule.--A mini truck operated upon a highway or roadway in this Commonwealth shall be equipped with the following equipment:(1) Brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop the vehicle.(2) An odometer. (3) A speedometer. (4) The original manufacturer's vehicle identification number die stamped upon the body or frame, or both, of the vehicle or the original manufacturer's vehicle identification number die stamped upon the engine or motor of the vehicle.(5) A windshield and windshield wipers. (6) A horn. (7) Head lamps. (8) Tail lamps. 20250HB1205PN1353 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Turn signals. (10) Side mirrors. (11) Seat belts. (12) Tires that conform with the requirements under section 4525 (relating to tire equipment and traction surfaces).(b) Exemption.--A mini truck is exempt from equipment requirements not enumerated in this subchapter.(c) Penalties.--An individual who operates a mini truck without the equipment prescribed in this section shall be subject to the penalties under section 6502 (relating to summary offenses).§ 3612. Operation. (a) State highways.-- (1) Except as otherwise provided under paragraphs (2) and (3), a mini truck may not be operated upon a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of the department with a posted speed limit in excess of 55 miles per hour.(2) The secretary may, by order, permit the use of a mini truck upon a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of the department where the posted speed limit is greater than 55 miles per hour but not greater than 70 miles per hour.(3) The secretary may, by order, prohibit the use of a mini truck upon any street under the jurisdiction of the department where the secretary determines that the operation of a mini truck would constitute a hazard.(4) The secretary shall transmit an order issued under paragraph (2) or (3) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania 20250HB1205PN1353 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bulletin.(b) Local roadways.-- (1) Except as otherwise provided under paragraph (2) or (3), a mini truck may not be operated upon a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of a local authority with a posted speed limit in excess of 55 miles per hour.(2) A local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, as appropriate, in the case of a roadway under its jurisdiction, permit the use of a mini truck where the posted speed limit is greater than 55 miles per hour but not greater than 70 miles per hour.(3) A local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, as appropriate, prohibit the use of a mini truck upon a roadway where the local authority determines that the operation of a mini truck would constitute a hazard.(c) Intersection with State highways.-- (1) A mini truck may enter an intersection and cross a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of the department where the posted speed limit is 55 miles per hour or less, provided that if the highway or roadway is more than two lanes or is divided, the crossing may only occur at a signalized intersection.(2) A mini truck may enter an intersection and cross a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of the department where the posted speed limit is in excess of 55 miles per hour only at a signalized intersection.(d) Intersection with local roadways.-- (1) A mini truck may enter an intersection and cross a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of a local authority where the posted speed limit is 55 miles per hour 20250HB1205PN1353 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or less, provided that if the highway or roadway is more than two lanes or is divided, the crossing may only occur at signalized intersections.(2) A mini truck may enter an intersection and cross a highway or roadway under the jurisdiction of a local authority where the posted speed limit is in excess of 55 miles per hour only at a signalized intersection.(e) Violation.--An individual operating a mini truck upon a highway or roadway or crossing a highway or roadway in violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties under section 6502 (relating to summary offenses).§ 3613. Same treatment as passenger cars. A mini truck shall be considered a passenger car for the purposes of Part II (relating to title, registration and licensing) and section 4581 (relating to restraint systems).§ 3614. Seating limitation. A mini truck may not be operated at a time in which the number of passengers exceeds the number of available safety belts in the vehicle.Section 4. Section 4703(b) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4703. Operation of vehicle without official certificate of inspection.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) does not apply to:* * *(15) Mini trucks.* * *Section 5. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4711. Vehicles exempt from emission inspections.20250HB1205PN1353 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A mini truck shall not be required to obtain an emissions inspection under this chapter.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1205PN1353 - 7 - 123